Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1702.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "manufacture" in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Manufacture", when the term is applied to malt or brewed beverages, shall mean and include all means, methods and processes used, employed and made use of, to produce, make and manufacture for commercial purposes, malt or brewed beverages from raw materials; when applied otherwise, it shall mean and include all means, methods and processes used, employed and made use of, to produce and make alcohol or liquor from raw materials, and shall mean and include rectification and blending of alcohol and liquor, the production, recovery or reuse of alcohol in the making, developing, using in the process of manufacture, denaturing, redistilling or recovering of any alcohol or liquor in distilleries, denaturing plants and wineries. The term shall not include the blending and storing overnight by a retail licensee of alcohol and liquor into a ready - to - draft pre-mixed keg cocktail. * * *"Ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktail" shall mean a beverage prepared on the licensed premises of a retail liquor licensee, in which a nonalcoholic cocktail base, consisting of juices, syrups, bitters, carbonated or noncarbonated water or other flavorings, is combined with liquor in a sealed keg or similar container for the purpose of dispensing cocktails for on-premises consumption using a gas-driven system.* * *Section 2. Section 491(4) of the act is amended to read:Section 491. Unlawful Acts Relative to Liquor, Alcohol and 20250HB1702PN2089 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Liquor Licensees.--It shall be unlawful--* * *(4) Possession and Use of Decanters. For any person to use decanters of alcoholic beverages except that the use of decanters or other similar receptacles by licensees shall be permitted in the case of wines and then only in accordance with the regulations of the board, but nothing herein contained shall prohibit the manufacture and possession of wine as provided in clause (2) of this section. For purposes of this clause, "other similar receptacles" shall not include the keg or any containers used in making ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails as defined in section 102.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1702PN2089 - 3 - 123456789101112131415